Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 2 Deeds, Mortgages and Leases Generally
§ 34-2-135.
Tax deeds; provisions cumulative and retroactive; effective date.

Nothing in this act [§§

34-2-131

through

34-2-135

] shall be construed to extend the period of any other applicable statute of limitations or to permit the commencement of any proceeding or the enforcement of any claim or interest which is barred by lapse of time or for any other reason. This act shall apply to tax deeds heretofore or hereafter recorded, but the commencement of any action, suit or proceeding shall not be precluded by this act until two (2) years after its effective date. No affidavit shall be recorded pursuant to this act until two (2) years after its effective date. This act shall not apply to tax deeds issued only covering severed oil, gas, hydrocarbons and other minerals and estates therein.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-62.5.

Editor's notes. —

Section 2, ch. 170, Laws 1975, makes the act effective 90 days after adjournment. The session adjourned on March 1, 1975.

§ 34-2-136.
Form of special warranty deed.

Conveyances of land may be substantially in the following form:

Special Warranty Deed A. B., grantor, (here insert name or names and place of residence), for and in consideration of (here insert consideration) in hand paid, conveys and specially warrants against all who claim by, through, or under the grantor, but against none other, to C. D., grantee, (here insert grantee’s name or names and place of residence) the following described real estate (here insert description) situate in the county of , state of Wyoming. Dated this day of A.D. A.B.

Click to view

History.

2015 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 106, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2015.

§ 34-2-137.
Form of special warranty deed; effect.

Every deed in substance in the form prescribed in W.S.

34-2-136

, when otherwise duly executed, shall have the effect of:

A conveyance in fee simple to the grantee, the grantee’s heirs, and assigns, of the property named in the special warranty deed, together with all the appurtenances, rights and privileges belonging to the property; and

A covenant from the grantor that:

The granted property is free from all encumbrances made by that grantor; and

The grantor will forever warrant and defend the title of the property in the grantee, the grantee’s heirs and assigns against any lawful claim and demand of the grantor and any person claiming or to claim by, through, or under the grantor, but against none other.

Any exceptions to a covenant described in paragraph (a)(ii) of this section, may be inserted in the deed following the description of the land.

History.

2015 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 106, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2015.